Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 12 Control of Hazardous Conditions,
Preventable Diseases, and
Metabolic Disorders

Administrative rules and regulations.

Notification of disease, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Disease Surveillance and Control, Subject 511-2-1.

Serologic test for syphilis for pregnant women, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Health Promotion, Subject 511-5-4.

Immunization of school children, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Disease Surveillance and Control, Subject 511-2-2.

Tuberculosis control, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Disease Surveillance and Control, Subject 511-2-3.

Law reviews.

For article, “Lurching from Complacency to Panic in the Fight Against Dangerous Microbes: A Blueprint for a Common Secure Future,” see 67 Emory L.J. 337 (2018).

For article, “Liability for Vaccine Injury: The United States, the European Union, and the Developing World,” see 67 Emory L.J. 415 (2018).

For article, “Do State Lines Make Public Health Emergencies Worse? Federal Versus State Control of Quarantine,” see 67 Emory L.J. 491 (2018).

For note, “Who Calls the Shots?: Parents Versus the Parens Patriae Power of the States to Mandate Vaccines for Children in New York,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 637 (2021).

For comment, “Public Health vs. Patient Rights:
Reconciling Informed Consent with HPR Vaccination,” see 58 Emory L. J. 761 (2009).

For comment, “Test At Your Own Risk:
Your Genetic Report Card and the Direct-To-Consumer Duty to Secure Informed Consent,” see 59 Emory L.J.
1553 (2010).

For comment, “Closing the Gap:
Protecting Predictive Neuroscience Information from Health Insurance Discrimination,” see 64 Emory L.J. 1433 (2015).

31-12-1.
Power to conduct research and studies.

The Department of Public Health and county boards of health are empowered to conduct studies, research, and training appropriate to the prevention of diseases and accidents, the use and control of toxic materials, and the prevention of environmental conditions which, if permitted to develop or continue, would likely endanger the health of individuals or communities.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1201, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Hazardous waste management, §

12-8-60

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-12-1.1.
“Bioterrorism” and “public health emergency” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Bioterrorism” means the intentional creation or use of any microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or any component thereof, whether naturally occurring or bioengineered, to cause death, illness, disease, or other biological malfunction in a human, animal, plant, or other living organism in order improperly or illegally to influence the conduct of government, to interfere with or disrupt commerce, or to intimidate or coerce a civilian population.

“Public health emergency” means the occurrence or imminent threat of an illness or health condition that is reasonably believed to be caused by bioterrorism or the appearance of a novel or previously controlled or eradicated infectious agent or biological toxin and poses a high probability of any of the following harms:

A large number of deaths in the affected population;

A large number of serious or long-term disabilities in the affected population; or

Widespread exposure to an infectious or toxic agent that poses a significant risk of substantial future harm to a large number of people in the affected population.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-12-1.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1386, § 5.

Cross references.

Sedition and subversive activities, T. 16, C. 11, A. 1, P. 2.

War on terrorism local assistance, T. 36, C. 75.

31-12-2.
Reporting certain diseases and neonatal abstinence syndrome; confidentiality; reporting required of pharmacists; immunity from liability as to information supplied; notification of potential bioterrorism.

The department is empowered to declare certain diseases, injuries, and conditions to be diseases requiring notice and to require the reporting thereof to the county board of health and the department in a manner and at such times as may be prescribed. The department shall require that such data be supplied as are deemed necessary and appropriate for the prevention of certain diseases, injuries, and conditions as are determined by the department. All such reports and data shall be deemed confidential and shall not be open to inspection by the public; provided, however, the department may release such reports and data in statistical form or for valid research purposes.

(a.1) (1)

As used in this subsection, the term “neonatal abstinence syndrome” means a group of physical problems that occur in a newborn infant who was exposed to addictive illegal or prescription drugs while in the mother’s womb.

A health care provider, coroner, or medical examiner shall report to the department and the county board of health all known or presumptively diagnosed cases of persons harboring any illness or health condition that may be caused by bioterrorism, epidemic or pandemic disease, or novel and highly fatal infectious agents or toxins and that may pose a substantial risk of a public health emergency. Reportable illnesses and conditions include, without limitation, diseases caused by biological agents listed at 42 C.F.R. Part 72, app. A (2000) and any illnesses or conditions identified by the department as potential causes of a public health emergency.

A pharmacist shall report to the department and the county board of health any unusual or increased prescription rates, unusual types of prescriptions, or unusual trends in pharmacy visits that may reasonably be believed to be caused by bioterrorism, epidemic or pandemic disease, or novel and highly fatal infectious agents or toxins and that may pose a substantial risk of a public health emergency.

Any person, including but not limited to practitioners of the healing arts, submitting in good faith reports or data to the department or county boards of health in compliance with the provisions of this Code section shall not be liable for any civil damages therefor.

Whenever the department learns of any case of an unusual illness, health condition, or death, or an unusual cluster of such events, or any other suspicious health related event that it reasonably believes has the potential to be caused by bioterrorism, it shall immediately notify the Department of Public Safety and other appropriate public safety authorities.

(2)

The department shall require notice and reporting of incidents of neonatal abstinence syndrome. A health care provider, coroner, or medical examiner, or any other person or entity the department determines has knowledge of diagnosis or health outcomes related, directly or indirectly, to neonatal abstinence syndrome shall report incidents of neonatal abstinence syndrome to the department. The department shall provide an annual report to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the chairperson of the House Committee on Health and Human Services, and the chairperson of the Senate Health and Human Services Committee. Such annual report shall include any department findings and recommendations on how to reduce the number of infants born with neonatal abstinence syndrome.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1202, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1077, §§ 2, 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1386, § 6; Ga. L. 2017, p. 319, § 4-1/HB 249.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added subsection (a.1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, the hyphen was deleted from “good faith” in subsection (b) (now subsection (d)).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 143 (2017).

For article, “Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996:
Health: Discussing Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, Relating to the Notification of Disease and the Control of Hazardous Conditions, Preventable Diseases, and Metabolic Disorders & Public Welfare:
Discussing Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Relating to the Department of Health and Human Services, and Administrative Data Standards and Related Requirements,”
see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 153 (2020).

31-12-2.1.
Investigation of potential bioterrorism activity; regulations and planning for public health emergencies.

The department shall ascertain the existence of any illness or health condition that may be caused by bioterrorism, epidemic or pandemic disease, or novel and highly fatal infectious agents or toxins and that may pose a substantial risk of a public health emergency; investigate all such cases to determine sources of infection and to provide for proper control measures; and define the distribution of the illness or health condition. The department shall:

Identify, interview, and counsel, as appropriate, all individuals reasonably believed to have been exposed to risk;

Develop information relating to the source and spread of the risk; and

Close, evacuate, or decontaminate, as appropriate, any facility and decontaminate or destroy any contaminated materials when the department reasonably suspects that such material or facility may endanger the public health.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations appropriate for management of any public health emergency declared pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 38-3-51, with particular regard to coordination of the public health emergency response of the state pursuant to subsection (i) of said Code section. Such rules and regulations shall be applicable to the activities of all entities created pursuant to Chapter 3 of this title in such circumstances, notwithstanding any other provisions of law. In developing such rules and regulations, the department shall consult and coordinate as appropriate with the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the Georgia Department of Public Safety, the Georgia Department of Agriculture, and the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. The department is authorized, in the course of management of a declared public health emergency, to adopt and implement emergency rules and regulations pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 50-13-4. Such rules and regulations shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” but shall be automatically referred by the Office of Legislative Counsel to the House of Representatives and Senate Committees on Judiciary.

The department shall promulgate, prepare, and maintain a public health emergency plan and draft executive order for the declaration of a public health emergency pursuant to Code Section 38-3-51 and Chapter 13 of Title 50. In preparation of such public health emergency plan and draft executive order, the department shall consult and coordinate as appropriate with the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the Georgia Department of Public Safety, the Georgia Department of Agriculture, and the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-12-2.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1386, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 4/SB 416.

Law reviews.

For article, “Mandatory Quarantine:
Administrative Order by the Georgia Department of Public Health for Public Health Control Measures:
Isolation Protocol,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2020).

31-12-3.
Power to require immunization and other preventive measures.

The department and all county boards of health are empowered to require, by appropriate rules and regulations, persons located within their respective jurisdictions to submit to vaccination against contagious or infectious disease where the particular disease may occur, whether or not the disease may be an active threat. The department may, in addition, require such other measures to prevent the conveyance of infectious matter from infected persons to other persons as may be necessary and appropriate. The department shall promulgate appropriate rules and regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this Code section in the case of a declaration of a public health emergency and shall include provisions permitting consideration of the opinion of a person’s personal physician as to whether the vaccination is medically appropriate or advisable for such person. Such rules and regulations shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” but shall be automatically referred by the Office of Legislative Counsel to the House of Representatives and Senate Committees on Judiciary.

In the absence of an epidemic or immediate threat thereof, this Code section shall not apply to any person who objects in writing thereto on grounds that such immunization conflicts with his religious beliefs.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1203, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1386, § 8.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, 08.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.20.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.07.21.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.22.21.07, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

31-12-3.1.
Vaccination registry; reporting requirements, maintenance, and use of information.

The department, for purposes of establishing and maintaining a single repository of accurate, complete, and current vaccination records to be used in aiding, coordinating, and promoting effective and cost-efficient disease prevention and control efforts, shall establish and maintain a vaccination registry.

Any person who administers a vaccine or vaccines licensed for use by the United States Food and Drug Administration to a person shall for each such vaccination provide to the department such data as are deemed by the department to be necessary and appropriate for purposes of the vaccination registry established pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, including, without limitation:

The name of the person;

The person’s date and place of birth, including the name of the hospital where delivered, if applicable;

The names and addresses of the person’s parents or guardians if the person is 18 years of age or younger;

The date of the vaccination and the specific type or types of vaccine or vaccines administered to the person on that date; and

Complications or side effects resulting from a vaccination, if any.

Vaccination data reporting requirements, including without limitation the types of data required to be reported and the time and manner of reporting such data, shall begin after the registry has established linkages to vaccine providers and shall be established by the department in consultation with the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the Georgia chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, and the Georgia Academy of Family Physicians.

The department shall utilize the registry to provide notices, whether by mail, telephone, personal contact, or other means, to persons and to parents or guardians regarding their children or wards who are due or overdue for a particular type of vaccination according to recommended vaccination schedules. The department shall consult with medical services providers to determine the most effective and efficient manner of using the registry to provide such notices.

Vaccination records for any person included within the vaccination registry shall be maintained as part of the registry until the person’s death.

Unless such person has opted out pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, individually identifiable vaccination information regarding a person may be provided to the department by, or released by the department to:

A health department, hospital, physician, or other provider of medical services to the person;

A school or child care facility in which the person is enrolled if the person is 18 years of age or younger; or

The United States Department of Health and Human Services and its subsidiaries through a data use agreement, for the limited purpose of reporting vaccines administered in response to a public health emergency declared pursuant to Code Section 38-3-51, for the purpose of averting a serious and imminent threat to life and safety, so long as the United States Department of Health and Human Services and its subsidiaries adhere to state and federal privacy laws and so long as a person’s name is not provided by the department

without the consent of the person or the person’s parents or guardians.

Any person or person’s parent or guardian if the person is 18 years of age or younger may request an exemption from enrollment in the state-wide vaccine registry. All persons shall be enrolled unless a specific exemption is requested by the person or the person’s parent or guardian if the person is 18 years of age or younger. A parent or guardian may obtain and upon request to the department shall be provided with all individually identifiable vaccination registry information regarding his or her child or ward. Except as provided otherwise by this Code section, individually identifiable vaccination registry information shall be treated as confidential and shall not be released to a third party without consent of the person or the person’s parent or guardian if the person is 18 years of age or younger.

Nothing in this Code section shall:

Prohibit the department from providing or publishing registry information in aggregate form for scientific, educational, or public health purposes, provided that such information is published without releasing or identifying individual names contained in the registry;

Prohibit the department or any medical services provider from notifying a person or the person’s parent or guardian if the person is 18 years of age or younger of the person’s vaccination status or of a vaccination that is due or overdue according to recommended vaccination schedules; or

Diminish a parent’s or guardian’s responsibility for having a child vaccinated properly.

Any person, including but not limited to practitioners of the healing arts, submitting or obtaining in good faith vaccination reports or data to or from the department in compliance with the provisions of this Code section and any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this Code section shall not be liable for any civil damages therefor.

The department is authorized to accept any grants, gifts, awards, and funds from government, public, and private sources to supplement any appropriation made for the purpose of funding the provisions of this Code section.

The department is authorized and directed to promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary and appropriate to implement the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-12-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 646, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 439, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 8/SB 46.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, rewrote subsection (e), which read: “Individually identifiable vaccination information regarding a person may be provided to the department by, or released by the department to, a local health department, hospital, physician, or other provider of medical services to the person or to a school or child care facility in which the person is enrolled if the person is 18 years of age or younger without the consent of the person or the person’s parents or guardians. All persons shall be enrolled unless a specific exemption is requested by the person or the person’s parent or guardian if the person is 18 years of age or younger. A parent or guardian may obtain and upon request to the department shall be provided with all individually identifiable vaccination registry information regarding his or her child or ward. Except as provided otherwise by this Code section, individually identifiable vaccination registry information shall be treated as confidential and shall not be released to a third party without consent of the person or the person’s parent or guardian if the person is 18 years of age or younger.”

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 , see Executive Order 11.20.20.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020
can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For note, “Who Calls the Shots?: Parents Versus the Parens Patriae Power of the States to Mandate Vaccines for Children in New York,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 637 (2021).

31-12-3.2.
Meningococcal disease; vaccinations; disclosures.

Every public and nonpublic postsecondary educational institution shall provide to each newly admitted freshman or matriculated student residing in campus housing as defined by the postsecondary educational institution or to the student’s parent or guardian if the student is a minor, the following information:

Meningococcal disease is a serious disease that can lead to death within only a few hours of onset; one in ten cases is fatal; and one in seven survivors of the disease is left with a severe disability, such as the loss of a limb, developmental disability, paralysis, deafness, or seizures;

Meningococcal disease is contagious but a largely preventable infection of the spinal cord fluid and the fluid that surrounds the brain;

Scientific evidence suggests that college students living in dormitory facilities are at a moderately increased risk of contracting meningococcal disease; and

Immunization against meningococcal disease will decrease the risk of the disease.

In accordance with the recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, newly admitted students who are 18 years of age or older residing in campus housing as defined by the postsecondary educational institution or residing in sorority or fraternity houses shall be required to sign a document provided by the postsecondary educational institution stating that he or she has received vaccination against meningococcal disease not more than five years prior to such admittance or reviewed the information provided as required by subsection (a) of this Code section. If a student is a minor, only a parent or guardian may sign such document.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require any postsecondary educational institution to provide or pay for vaccinations of students against meningococcal disease.

Any postsecondary educational institution that has made a reasonable effort to comply with this Code section shall not be liable for damages or injuries sustained by a student by reason of such student’s contracting meningococcal disease.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-12-3.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2015, p. 297, § 1/HB 504.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “institution” was substituted for “instutition” in subsection (a).

31-12-4.
Isolation and segregation of diseased persons; quarantine.

The department and all county boards of health may, from time to time, require the isolation or segregation of persons with communicable diseases or conditions likely to endanger the health of others. The department may, in addition, require quarantine or surveillance of carriers of disease and persons exposed to, or suspected of being infected with, infectious disease until they are found to be free of the infectious agent or disease in question. The department shall promulgate appropriate rules and regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this Code section in the case of a declaration of a public health emergency. Such rules and regulations shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” but shall be automatically referred by the Office of Legislative Counsel to the House of Representatives and Senate Committees on Judiciary.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1204, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1386, § 9.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For article, “Medical Decision-Making in Georgia,” see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 50 (2005).

For article, “Mandatory Quarantine:
Administrative Order by the Georgia Department of Public Health for Public Health Control Measures:
Isolation Protocol,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2020).

31-12-4.1.
Smallpox vaccination and treatment program.

The Georgia General Assembly makes the following findings: The attacks of September and October, 2001, on the United States have heightened concerns that terrorists may have access to the smallpox virus and may attempt to use it against the American public. In light of these concerns, and in order to secure public health and national security, the United States government has launched, and the State of Georgia has cooperated in, a smallpox vaccination and treatment program, with a recommendation for initial smallpox vaccinations for certain hospitals, health care workers, and emergency response workers. However, due to the virulent nature of smallpox and its vaccine, participation by hospitals and health care workers in such a program potentially increases their exposure to liability that, without sufficient legal protections, may significantly discourage their participation in the program. The federal government has determined, and the General Assembly agrees, that liability protection for those hospitals and health care workers who participate in such programs are integral to ensuring its maximum success. Accordingly, to achieve a potent and widespread smallpox vaccination and treatment program and maintain an effective defense against possible terrorist attacks, it is critical that hospitals and health care workers participating in such program be protected from potential legal liability absent their gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. The General Assembly therefore concludes that certain steps must be taken to encourage participation in the smallpox vaccination and treatment program in order to reserve to Georgia citizens continued access to smallpox vaccination and treatment services in the event of a terrorist attack.

Without waiving or affecting and cumulative of any existing immunity from any source, unless it is established that injuries or death were caused by gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct:

No licensed hospital which participates in a smallpox vaccination and treatment program authorized by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services or the United States Public Health Service of the State of Georgia or employees, agents, or health care workers of such hospital; and

No licensed health care provider, health care worker, or other person who participates in such smallpox vaccination and treatment program, whether or not such provider, workers, or person is an agent or employee of said hospital

shall be liable for damages or injuries alleged to have been sustained by any individual by reason of such individual’s receipt of a smallpox vaccination or treatment, such individual’s exposure to smallpox or its related infections, or any act or omission committed by said hospital, employee, agent, health care provider, health care worker, or other person as a result of such individual’s receipt of services from or related to such smallpox vaccination and treatment program.

This Code section shall apply only to causes of action arising on or after June 2, 2003.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-12-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 569, § 3.

Cross references.

Immunization of students, §

20-2-771

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2003, “June 2, 2003” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” in subsection (c).

31-12-5.
State-wide network for medical genetics services.

The department and appropriate medical centers shall cooperate in the development of a state-wide network for medical genetics.

The network shall be available state-wide and will be responsible for training of personnel in genetics, research in inborn errors of metabolism, and quality control of laboratory services for genetics. This system shall also provide counseling regarding genetically caused disorders.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1203, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 2262, § 2.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Testing for inherited disorders in the newborn, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Public Health, Health Promotion, Subject 511-5-5.

31-12-6.
System for prevention of serious illness, severe physical or developmental disability, and death resulting from inherited metabolic and genetic disorders; establishment of Newborn Screening and Genetics Advisory Committee.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations creating a newborn screening system for the prevention of serious illness, severe physical or developmental disability, and death caused by inherited metabolic and genetic disorders as identified by the department. The department shall be authorized to consider recommendations from the Newborn Screening and Genetics Advisory Committee established pursuant to subsection (i) of this Code section, to include disorders which are added to the federal Recommended Uniform Screening Panel and may be identified in the future to result in serious illness, severe physical or developmental disability, and death if undiagnosed and untreated.

The entire process for screening, retrieval, and diagnosis must occur within time frames established by the department pursuant to rules and regulations, and the system shall be structured to meet this critical need.

The department shall be responsible for the screening of all newborns for the disorders enumerated by the department and in a manner determined by the department pursuant to rules and regulations and shall be responsible for assessment of the program. When any new disorder is approved by the department after recommendation by the Newborn Screening and Genetics Advisory Committee established pursuant to subsection (i) of this Code section, the department shall submit a budget request to the Office of Planning and Budget prior to the General Assembly’s next legislative session seeking appropriations to cover the new disorder added to the newborn screening system. The department shall begin screening newborns for any such new disorder no later than 18 months after such appropriation becomes effective.

The department shall, to the extent state or federal funds are available for such purposes, including but not limited to funds provided under Title V of the Social Security Act, the Maternal and Child Health Services Block Grant, provide for retrieving potentially affected screenees back into the health care system, accomplishing specific diagnoses, initiating and continuing therapy, and assessing the program.

The department shall utilize appropriate existing resources whenever possible and shall cause the coordination and cooperation of agencies and organizations having resources necessary for the creation of an effective system.

The department shall be authorized to establish and periodically adjust, by rule and regulation, fees associated with the screening, retrieval, and diagnosis conducted pursuant to this Code section to help defray or meet the costs incurred by the department. In no event shall the fees exceed such costs, both direct and indirect, in providing such screenings and related services, provided that no services shall be denied on the basis of inability to pay. All fees paid thereunder shall be paid into the general fund of the State of Georgia.

The department shall allow any laboratory licensed in Georgia and authorized to perform screening of newborn infants in any state using normal pediatric reference ranges to conduct the analysis required pursuant to this Code section; provided, however, that the screening may be conducted by a laboratory located outside of Georgia if approved by the board. The testing performed by such laboratory must include testing for newborn diseases as required by law or regulation, except as otherwise provided by the department, and shall provide test results and reports consistent with law and with policies, procedures, and regulations of the department.

The requirements of this Code section with regard to screening, retrieval, and diagnosis shall not apply to any infant whose parents object in writing thereto on the grounds that such tests and treatment conflict with their religious tenets and practices.

There is established the Newborn Screening and Genetics Advisory Committee. The advisory committee shall consist of not less than 11 nor more than 21 members to be appointed by the commissioner. Each member of the advisory committee shall serve a three-year term and until the appointment of his or her successor. Any member may be reappointed by the commissioner. The advisory committee shall meet at least two times per year or upon the call of the chairperson. The advisory committee shall consider and make recommendations to the commissioner related to the inclusion of screening for any disorder added to the federal Recommended Uniform Screening Panel (RUSP), within one year of such addition. As part of such recommendations, the advisory committee shall advise the commissioner on the estimated cost to the department for screening for such disorder. The advisory committee shall be authorized to establish ad hoc subcommittees and to advise the commissioner on procedures for collection and transmission of specimens and the recording of diagnostic results.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1202, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 2262, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 369, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 31; Ga. L. 2006, p. 416, § 1/HB 1066; Ga. L. 2017, p. 479, § 2/HB 241; Ga. L. 2021, p. 419, § 2/HB 567.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “Krabbe disease,” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (a); added “; provided, however, that screening for Krabbe disease shall be conducted separately at the option of the parent or parents” at the end of subsection (c); added “; provided, however, that the fees for screening for Krabbe disease shall be paid directly by the parents to the laboratory” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (f); and, in subsection (g), added “; provided, however, that the screening for Krabbe disease may be conducted by a laboratory located outside of Georgia if approved by the board” at the end of the first sentence, and inserted “, except for Krabbe disease,” in the second sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “The department shall promulgate rules and regulations creating a system for the prevention of serious illness, severe physical or developmental disability, and death caused by genetic conditions, such as phenylketonuria, galactosemia, homocystinuria, maple syrup urine disease, hypothyroidism, congenital adrenal hyperplasia, Krabbe disease, and such other inherited metabolic and genetic disorders as may be identified in the future to result in serious illness, severe physical or developmental disability, and death if undiagnosed and untreated. The system shall have five components: screening newborns for the disorders; retrieving potentially affected screenees back into the health care system; accomplishing specific diagnoses; initiating and continuing therapy; and assessing the program.”; substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “The department shall be responsible for the screening of all newborns for the disorders enumerated and in a manner determined by the department pursuant to rules and regulations and shall be responsible for assessment of the program; provided, however, that screening for Krabbe disease shall be conducted separately at the option of the parent or parents.”; revised punctuation in subsection (d); deleted the proviso at the end of the first sentence of subsection (f), which read: “; provided, however, that the fees for screening for Krabbe disease shall be paid directly by the parents to the laboratory”; in subsection (g), in the first sentence, deleted “testing” following “perform screening” near the middle, deleted “for Krabbe disease” following “the screening” in the proviso, and substituted “as otherwise provided by the department” for “for Krabbe disease” in the middle of the second sentence; deleted former subsection (h), which read: “No later than January 1, 2007, the Georgia Department of Audits and Accounts shall conduct an assessment evaluating the efficiency and effectiveness of the newborn screenings conducted by the Georgia Public Health Laboratory pursuant to this Code section. If it is determined that private laboratories can provide testing at a lower cost than the Georgia Public Health Laboratory, the department shall issue a request for proposals to qualified vendors including any private laboratory licensed in Georgia as established in subsection (g) of this Code section. The Georgia Public Health Laboratory shall be eligible to respond to such request for proposals.”; redesignated former subsection (i) as present subsection (h); and added subsection (i).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 479, § 1/HB 241, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Cove’s Law.’ ”.

U.S. Code.

Title V of the Social Security Act, referred to in subsection (d) of this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 701

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Baby Doe Cases: Compromise and Moral Dilemma,” see 34 Emory L.J. 545 (1986).